Washington statutes.
RCW 19.36.900

Effective date—Application—1990 c 211.

RCW 19.36.100 through 19.36.140 shall take effect July 1, 1990, and shall apply only to credit agreements entered into on or after July 1, 1990.

[ 1990 c 211 s 6.]